Maryland, session 2026, HB1456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1330.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMERCIAL ENTITY” INCLUDES A SOCIAL MEDIA
PLATFORM.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY FOR LEASE
OR SALE THAT IS LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(C) A COMMERCIAL ENTITY MAY NOT PUBLISH OR ADVERTISE
INFORMATION ON RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY AVAILABLE FOR LEASE OR SALE ON
BEHALF OF ANOTHER UNLESS THE COMMERCIAL ENTITY VERIFIES THAT THE
PERSON OFFERING THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY FOR LEASE OR SALE IS:
(1) THE LEGAL OWNER OF THE PROPERTY; OR
(2) AN AGENT OF THE LEGAL OWNER OF THE PROPERTY; OR

HOUSE BILL 1456 3
(3) EXERCISING A LEGAL REMEDY TO SELL THE RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY UNDER STATE LAW.
(C) (D) A COMMERCIAL ENTITY SHALL MAINTAIN A VERIFICATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) (C) OF THIS SECTION FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS.
(D) (E) IF A LICENSED REAL ESTATE AGENT, BROKER, OR ASSOCIATE
BROKER PUBLISHES OR ADVERTISES RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY FOR SALE OR
LEASE, THE PUBLICATION OR ADVERTISEMENT SHALL BE CONSIDERED VERIFIED IF
THE PUBLICATION OR ADVERTISEMENT:
(1) WAS MADE BY THE AGENT, BROKER, OR ASSOCIATE BROKER ON A
WEBSITE OR MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE; OR
(2) IS REPUBLISHED WITH CONSENT OF THE AGENT, BROKER, OR
ASSOCIATE BROKER.
(F) A COMMERCIAL ENTITY THAT PUBLISHES OR ADVERTISES
INFORMATION IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
PROMPTLY REMOVE THE PUBLICATION OR ADVERTISEMENT.
(E) (G) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.